lexd/prep_post.lexd
#############################
### (PRE-/POST-)POSITIONS ###
#############################

PATTERNS
GlobCliticsPrep? PrepBase GlobClitics?

PATTERN PrepBase
LexiconPrep|Preposition     [<prep>:]
LexiconPost|Postposition    [<post>:]

# глоссы из внутреннего документа экспедиций ВШЭ в город Хорог
LEXICON Preposition
ар
аз
ас
ба
чи
пар
пи
пис
тар
то

LEXICON Postposition
бӣрӣн
бӣр
хез
хел
